Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB392.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--* * *(a.13) (1) An amount paid as real property taxes that exceeds the amount of the deduction for real property taxes permitted under 26 U.S.C. § 164(b)(6)(B) (relating to taxes) shall be deductible from taxable income on the annual personal income tax return. The deduction shall not result in taxable income being less than zero.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (2) For purposes of this subsection:(i) The term "homestead" means the owner-occupied, primary residence and the parcel of land within this Commonwealth on which the residence is located and other improvements located on the parcel. If a portion of the structure is used for a nonresidential purpose, the homestead is equal to that portion of the property used as the primary residence of the owner-occupant.(ii) The term "real property tax" means the total real property tax imposed by a school district on a homestead for the tax year. Real property tax imposed by a city of the first class shall constitute taxes imposed by a school district for the purposes of this definition. The term does not include payments made in lieu of taxes or any penalties or interest paid in connection with the tax.(iii) The term "residence" means a structure used as a place of habitation by the owner of the structure.* * *Section 2. The addition of section 303(a.13) of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0392PN0338 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021